Hawaii statutes.
[§663J-9] Other remedies preserved.
The remedies provided under this chapter do not restrict the right of any
person to bring an action under other law, including common law, to recover
damages arising out of the use of the individual in prostitution or the
coercion incident to the individual being used in prostitution; nor does this
chapter limit or restrict the liability of any person under other law. [L 1999,
c 203, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next